Washington statutes.
RCW 19.310.005

Finding—Purpose.

The legislature finds that there are no statutory requirements pertaining to persons who facilitate like-kind exchanges pursuant to section 1031 of the internal revenue code and associated treasury regulations. The purpose of this chapter is to create a statutory framework that provides some consumer protections to those who entrust money or property to persons acting as exchange facilitators.

[ 2009 c 70 s 1.]